California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(k) (1) For any particular payment adjustment year, no hospital may qualify for payments under more than one subdivision among subdivisions (g), (h), (i), and (j). If any hospital qualifies under more than one subdivision, the department shall determine which subdivision shall apply for payments.

(2) For each payment adjustment year beginning with 1992–93, the total applicable per diem payment
 adjustment amount calculated for each eligible hospital pursuant to subdivision (g), (h), (i), or (j) shall be adjusted by a percentage identical to the percentage increase in transfer amounts that the department has authorized for use pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 14163 for the particular fiscal year. 

(3) If an eligible hospital ordinarily is paid by or on behalf of the department for Medi-Cal acute inpatient hospital services based on a payment methodology other than per diem payments, the eligible hospital shall receive payment adjustment amounts under subdivision (g), (h), (i), or (j) of this section based on its approved Medi-Cal days of acute inpatient hospital care, in the same fashion as all other eligible hospitals under this section.

(l) (1) (A) In determining Medi-Cal days of service for
 purposes of payment adjustments under this section, the department shall recognize all acute inpatient hospital days of service required to be taken into account under federal law.

(B) For the 1992–93 payment year, the department may consider the Medi-Cal days of service provided by the qualifying hospitals for Medi-Cal patients covered by the prepaid health plans contracting directly with the Medi-Cal program in achieving their maximum payments.

(C) For 1993–94 and subsequent payment years, the department may consider the Medi-Cal days of service provided by hospitals for Medi-Cal patients covered by the prepaid health plans contracting directly with the Medi-Cal program in determining the Medi-Cal utilization rate and the maximum days of payment. Additionally, the department may consider the days of service provided by the qualifying hospitals for Medi-Cal patients covered by
 the prepaid health plans contracting directly with the Medi-Cal program in achieving their maximum payments in those payment years.

(D) In order to meet the requirements of subparagraph (C), the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development shall provide to the department quarterly access to all data elements on the edited and unedited confidential patient discharge data files, including Social Security account numbers. The department shall match these data with the department’s Medi-Cal Eligibility Data System files to extract any data necessary to meet the requirements of subparagraph (C). The department shall maintain the confidentiality of all patient discharge data to the same extent as is required of the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), there shall be, for each eligible hospital, a maximum limit on the number of
 Medi-Cal acute inpatient hospital days for which payment adjustment amounts may be paid under this section with respect to each payment adjustment year. The maximum limit shall be that number of days that equals 80 percent of the eligible hospital’s annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days, as determined from all Medi-Cal paid claims records available through April 1 preceding the beginning of the payment adjustment year.

(m) No payment rate for any service rendered by any hospital under the Medi-Cal selective provider contracting program shall be reduced as a result of this section. 

(n) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to the extent consistent with federal law, and except as provided by this section, no maximum payment limit shall be placed on the amount of Medi-Cal payment adjustments which may be made to disproportionate share hospitals. The payments made to
 disproportionate share hospitals pursuant to this section and Section 14105.99 shall not cause any other amounts paid or payable to a hospital to be deemed in excess of any applicable maximum payment limit.

(o) The department shall promptly seek any necessary federal approvals in order to implement this section, including any amendments. Pursuant to Section 1396r-4 of Title 42 of the United States Code, and related federal medicaid statutes and regulations, payment adjustment systems for inpatient hospital services rendered by disproportionate share hospitals shall be included in a state’s medicaid plan. Therefore, the department shall, prior to the end of the calendar quarter during which this section is enacted or amended, submit for federal approval an amendment to the Medi-Cal State Plan in connection with the payment adjustment program.

(p) (1) The
 department shall compute, prior to the beginning of each payment adjustment year, the projected size of the payment adjustment program for the particular payment adjustment year. To do so, the department shall determine the projected total payment adjustment amount for each eligible hospital, and shall add these amounts together to determine the projected total size of the program. To the extent this projected total figure for the program exceeds the portion of the maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under federal law that the department anticipates will be available for the period in question, the department shall reduce the total per diem composite amounts of the various eligible hospitals in the fashion described below so that the allotment in question will not be exceeded.

(2) As an initial step, all total per diem composite amounts for the entire payment adjustment year shall be reduced proportionately
 not to exceed 2 percent of each total per diem composite amount.

(3) If the reductions authorized by paragraph (2) are insufficient to align the program with the federal allotment for California, then, to the extent permitted by federal law, the following shall apply:

(A) The adjusted total per diem composite amounts, as calculated under paragraph (2), shall remain in effect for each eligible hospital whose low-income number is 30 percent or more.

(B) The adjusted total per diem composite amounts, as calculated under paragraph (2), for all other eligible hospitals shall be further reduced proportionately to align the program with the federal allotment, but in no event to a level that is less than 65 percent of the total per diem composite amount that would have been payable to the eligible hospital had no reductions
 taken place.

(4) If the steps set forth in paragraph (3) are not permissible under federal law, or are not adequate to align the program with the federal allotment, the adjusted total per diem composite amounts for all eligible hospitals for the entire payment adjustment year shall be further reduced proportionately to align the program with the federal allotment, but in no event to a level that would result in adjusted total per diem composite amounts that are less than 65 percent of the total per diem composite amounts that would have been payable had no reductions taken place.

(5) When all eligible hospitals have been reduced to the 65-percent level set forth in paragraphs (3) and (4), the adjusted total per diem composite amounts for all eligible hospitals shall be further reduced proportionately as necessary to align the program with the federal allotment.

(6) This subdivision shall not apply to the 1995–96 payment adjustment year.

(q) (1) If it is necessary to apply the provisions of paragraph (3) of subdivision (p) at any time, the department shall, as soon as practicable, evaluate why the insufficiency arose and identify the projected occurrence and duration of any future insufficiencies.

(2) If the department determines as a result of the evaluations under paragraph (1) that (A) implementation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (p) will likely be necessary to resolve additional insufficiencies for the current payment adjustment year or the next payment adjustment year; and (B) that the level of federal financial participation realized by the payment adjustment program, for the current payment adjustment year as a whole, will be less than 30 percent
 of the percentage of federal financial participation that normally is applicable for Medi-Cal expenditures for acute inpatient hospital services, and that the level of federal financial participation for the payment adjustment program is expected to continue to remain below that 30-percent level for the next payment adjustment year as a whole, the department shall, as soon as practicable, implement paragraphs (3) and (4). 

(3) If the department determines that the circumstances described in paragraph (2) are present, the payment adjustment program shall be terminated, effective as of the earliest date permissible under federal law. In that event, all installment payments to the fund which are already due pursuant to Section 14163 at the time of the department’s determination shall remain due, and shall be collected by the Controller. However, installment payments which are not yet due at that time shall not become due. 

(4) Within 90 days after the termination of the payment adjustment program, as referred to in paragraph (3), or as soon as practicable, the department shall determine whether any amounts remain in the fund that are not needed to pay prior payment adjustment amounts under this section. If remaining amounts exist in the fund, they shall be refunded to transferor entities on a pro rata basis, within 45 days after the date of the department’s determination.

(r) (1) The state shall be held harmless from any federal disallowance resulting from payments made under this section, and from payments made to hospitals based on transfers accepted by the department under Section 14164. Any hospital that has received payments under this section, or based on transfers accepted by the department under Section 14164, shall be liable for any audit exception or federal disallowance
 only with respect to the payments made to that hospital. The department shall recoup from a hospital the amount of any audit exception or federal disallowance in the manner authorized by applicable laws and regulations.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, if any payment adjustment that has been paid, or that otherwise would have been payable to an eligible hospital under this section, exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the particular hospital, the department shall withhold or recoup the payment adjustment amount that exceeds the limitation. The nonfederal component of the amount withheld or recouped shall be redeposited in, or shall remain in, the fund, as applicable, until used for the purposes described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (j) of Section 14163.

(s) (1) The department may utilize existing administrative appeal procedures
 for purposes of any appealable matter that arises under the payment adjustment program. The matters that may be appealed shall be limited to those related to the following:

(A) Paragraph (5) of subdivision (f). 

(B) State audit disallowances of amounts paid to hospitals under the payment adjustment program. 

(2) Calculations which are final pursuant to paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (f) or the procedures or data on which those calculations are based, shall not be appealed.

(t) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the department shall take all appropriate steps permitted by law and the Medi-Cal State Plan to ensure the following for all years of the payment adjustment program:

(A) That well-baby (nursery) days and acute administrative days are included in the payment adjustment program in the same fashion as all other Medi-Cal days of acute inpatient hospital service.

(B) That, to the same extent as any other Medi-Cal days of acute inpatient hospital service, well-baby (nursery) days and acute administrative days are included as payable days under the payment adjustment program and in the total of annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days.

(C) That, if pursuant to paragraph (2), any well-baby (nursery) days or acute administrative days are not included in the payment adjustment program for payment purposes for any parts of the 1992–93 or 1993–94 payment adjustment years, all those days are nevertheless included in the total of annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days for all purposes under the
 payment adjustment program, unless otherwise barred by paragraph (2).

(2) In no event shall paragraph (1) be implemented in a fashion that is inconsistent with federal medicaid law or the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(u) (1) For the 1993–94 payment adjustment year, each eligible hospital shall also be eligible to receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the hospital being included on the disproportionate share list as of September 30, 1993. For purposes of federal medicaid rules, including Section 447.297(d) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the supplemental payment adjustments shall be applicable to the federal fiscal year that ends on September 30, 1993.

(2) The availability of supplemental payment adjustments under this subdivision shall
 be determined as follows:

(A) The final maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules shall be identified for the 1993 federal fiscal year. This final allotment is two billion one hundred ninety-one million four hundred fifty-one thousand dollars ($2,191,451,000), as specified at page 43186 of Volume 58 of the Federal Register.

(B) The total amount of all per diem payment adjustment amounts under this section, whether paid or payable, that are applicable to the 1993 federal fiscal year shall be determined. The applicability of the per diem payment adjustment amounts to the 1993 federal fiscal year shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) The figure determined under subparagraph (B) shall be subtracted from the figure identified under subparagraph (A). If the remainder is a positive figure, supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments shall be made under this subdivision in accordance with paragraph (3).

(3) The amount of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment to each eligible hospital shall be computed as follows:

(A) The projected total of all per diem payment adjustment amounts payable to each particular eligible hospital under this section for the 1993–94 payment adjustment year shall be determined. For each hospital, this figure shall be identical to the figure used for the same hospital in the calculations regarding transfer amounts under subdivision (h) of Section 14163 for the 1993–94 state fiscal year.

(B) The projected totals for all eligible hospitals determined under subparagraph (A) shall be added together to determine an aggregate total of all projected per diem payment adjustments for the 1993–94 payment adjustment year. This figure shall be identical to the aggregate figure for all hospitals used in the calculations regarding transfer amounts under subdivision (h) of Section 14163 for the 1993–94 state fiscal year.

(C) The figure determined for each eligible hospital under subparagraph (A) shall be divided by the aggregate figure determined under subparagraph (B), yielding a percentage figure for each hospital.

(D) The percentage figure determined for each hospital under subparagraph (C) shall be multiplied by the positive remainder calculated under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2).

(E) The product as so determined for each eligible hospital under subparagraph (D) shall be the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount payable to the particular hospital.

(4) The department shall make partial payments of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments to eligible hospitals on or before January 1, 1994. The department shall make final calculations regarding the supplemental lump-sum payments based on data available as of March 1, 1994, and shall distribute the final payments promptly thereafter.

(5) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available. In doing so, the department shall comply with any procedures
 instituted by the Health Care Financing Administration in connection with Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(v) (1) For the 1993–94 payment adjustment year, each eligible hospital that remains in operation as of June 30, 1994, shall also be eligible to receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the hospital being a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date.

(2) The availability of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision shall be determined by the department as follows:

(A) The final maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules shall be identified for the 1994 federal fiscal
 year. This final allotment is two billion one hundred ninety-one million four hundred fifty-one thousand dollars ($2,191,451,000), as specified on page 22676 of Volume 59 of the Federal Register.

(B) The total amount of all per diem payment adjustment amounts under this section, whether paid or payable, that are applicable to the period October 1, 1993, through June 30, 1994, shall be determined. The applicability of the per diem payment adjustment amounts to this period of time shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) The figure determined under subparagraph (B) shall be subtracted from the figure identified under subparagraph (A). If the remainder is a positive figure, supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments shall be made under this subdivision in accordance
 with paragraph (3).

(3) The amount of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment to each hospital shall be computed as follows:

(A) The projected total of all other payment adjustment amounts payable to each particular hospital under this section applicable to the 1993–94 payment adjustment year shall be determined. For each hospital, this figure shall be identical to the sum of the figures used for the same hospital in the calculations regarding transfer amounts under subdivision (h) of Section 14163 for the 1993–94 state fiscal year, not including the supplemental lump-sum payments described in this subdivision.

(B) The projected totals for all hospitals determined under subparagraph (A) shall be added together to determine an aggregate total. This aggregate total shall be identical to the aggregate figure for
 all hospitals used in the calculations regarding transfer amounts under subdivision (h) of Section 14163 for the 1993–94 state fiscal year, not including the supplemental lump-sum payments described in this subdivision.

(C) The figure determined for each hospital under subparagraph (A) shall be divided by the aggregate figure determined under subparagraph (B), yielding a percentage figure for each hospital.

(D) The percentage figure determined for each hospital under subparagraph (C) shall be multiplied by the positive remainder calculated under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2).

(E) The product determined under subparagraph (D) for each hospital shall be the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount payable to the particular hospital, which shall be payable because the facility is a disproportionate share
 hospital in operation as of June 30, 1994.

(4) The department shall make interim and final payments of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments to hospitals on or before October 31, 1994.

(5) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available. In doing so, the department shall comply with any procedures instituted by the Health Care Financing Administration in connection with Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(w) (1) For the 1994–95 payment adjustment year, each eligible hospital that remains in operation as of June 30, 1995, shall also be eligible to receive
 a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the hospital being a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date.

(2) The availability of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this subdivision shall be determined by the department as follows:

(A) The final maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under the provisions of applicable federal medicaid rules shall be identified for the 1995 federal fiscal year.

(B) The total amount of all per diem payment adjustment amounts under this section, whether paid or payable, that are applicable to the period October 1, 1994, through June 30, 1995, shall be determined. The applicability of the per diem payment adjustment amounts to this period of time shall be determined in accordance with
 federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) The figure determined under subparagraph (B) shall be subtracted from the figure identified under subparagraph (A). If the remainder is a positive figure, supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments shall be made under this subdivision in accordance with paragraph (3).

(3) The amount of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment to each hospital shall be computed as follows:

(A) The projected total of all other payment adjustment amounts payable to each particular hospital under this section applicable to the 1994–95 payment adjustment year shall be determined. For each hospital, this figure shall be identical to the sum of the figures used for the same hospital in the calculations regarding
 transfer amounts under subdivision (h) of Section 14163 for the 1994–95 state fiscal year, not including the supplemental lump-sum payments described in this subdivision.

(B) The projected totals for all hospitals determined under subparagraph (A) shall be added together to determine an aggregate total. This aggregate total shall be identical to the aggregate figure for all hospitals used in the calculations regarding transfer amounts under subdivision (h) of Section 14163 for the 1994–95 state fiscal year, not including the supplemental lump-sum payments described in this subdivision.

(C) The figure determined for each hospital under subparagraph (A) shall be divided by the aggregate figure determined under subparagraph (B), yielding a percentage figure for each hospital.

(D) The percentage figure determined for
 each hospital under subparagraph (C) shall be multiplied by the positive remainder calculated under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2).

(E) The product as so determined under subparagraph (D) for each hospital shall be the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment amount payable to the particular hospital, which shall be payable because the facility is a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of June 30, 1995.

(4) The department shall make interim and final payments of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments to hospitals on or before October 31, 1995.

(5) The department shall implement this subdivision only to the extent consistent with federal medicaid law and the Medi-Cal State Plan, and only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation is available. In doing so,
 the department shall comply with any procedures instituted by the Health Care Financing Administration in connection with Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(x) (1) With respect to per diem payment adjustments otherwise payable in connection with the period of July 1 through September 30 of the 1994–95 payment adjustment year, payment adjustment amounts shall be adjusted as described in paragraph (2).

(2) No per diem payment adjustment amounts shall be payable in connection with the period of July 1 through September 30 of the 1994–95 payment adjustment year. The Medi-Cal days of acute inpatient hospital service paid by or on behalf of the department that otherwise would have given rise to payment adjustment amounts with respect to this period of time shall not count toward the maximum limit set forth in
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (l).

(y) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except subdivision (z), the payment adjustment program for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year shall be structured as set forth below.

(1) (A) The department shall, in the manner used for prior years, compute the projected total payment adjustment amounts for all eligible hospitals, by determining for each eligible hospital its total per diem composite amount and multiplying that figure by 80 percent of the hospital’s annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days.

(B) The products of the calculations under subparagraph (A) for all eligible hospitals shall be added together. The sum of all these figures shall be the unadjusted projected total payment adjustment program for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year.

(2) The remaining amount available as part of the state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California under applicable federal rules for July 1995 through September 1995 (as part of the 1995 federal fiscal year) shall be recognized as being zero.

(3) The department shall estimate what the state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California will be for the 1996 federal fiscal year under applicable federal rules. The estimate shall not exceed the allotment that was applicable for California for the 1995 federal fiscal year.

(4) The estimate identified by the department under paragraph (3) shall be reduced by subtracting the total amount of the supplemental lump-sum payments paid or payable under subdivisions (v) and (w).

(5) The
 remainder determined under paragraph (4) shall be added to the amount determined under paragraph (2). The total of those two amounts shall be the unadjusted tentative size of the payment adjustment program for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year.

(6) The total per diem composite amount computed for each eligible hospital under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall be modified as follows:

(A) The department shall reduce the total per diem composite amount for each eligible hospital by multiplying the amount by an identical percentage. The percentage figure to be used for this purpose shall be that percentage that is derived by dividing the amount determined under paragraph (5) by the unadjusted projected total payment adjustment program amount determined under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(B) The percentage
 figure derived under subparagraph (A) shall be applied to the total per diem composite amount for each eligible hospital, yielding an adjusted total per diem composite amount for each hospital for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year.

(C) (i) The adjusted total per diem composite amount determined under subparagraph (B) for each eligible hospital shall be multiplied by 80 percent of the hospital’s annualized Medi-Cal inpatient paid days.

(ii) The amount computed for each hospital under clause (i) shall be compared to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation that, in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan, the department has computed for the particular hospital.

(iii) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital is less than the OBRA 1993 payment
 limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under clause (i) shall be used for purposes of clause (v).

(iv) Where the amount computed under clause (i) for the particular hospital exceeds the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the hospital, the amount computed under clause (i) shall be reduced to an amount equal to the OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the particular hospital. The amount as so reduced shall be used for purposes of clause (v).

(v) The amount for each hospital, as determined under either clause (iii) or clause (iv), as applicable, shall be the adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for the hospital for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year.

(D) The adjusted figures computed for all eligible hospitals under subparagraph (C) shall be added together, yielding the adjusted tentative size of the
 payment adjustment program for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year.

(7) The adjusted tentative size of the payment adjustment program for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year as determined under subparagraph (D) of paragraph (6), and the adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for each eligible hospital, as determined under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (6), shall be distributed as follows:

(A) No per diem payment adjustment amounts shall be payable in connection with the period of July 1 through September 30 of the 1995–96 payment adjustment year. The Medi-Cal days of acute inpatient hospital service paid by or on behalf of the department that otherwise would have given rise to payment adjustment amounts with respect to this period of time shall not count toward the maximum limit set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (l).

(B) For all eligible hospitals, the adjusted per diem composite amounts (as determined under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6)) shall be the amounts payable with respect to the period of October 1 through June 30 of the 1995–96 payment adjustment year, subject to the applicable provisions of subdivision (z).

(8) For the 1995–96 payment adjustment year, each eligible hospital that remains in operation as of June 30, 1996, shall also be eligible to receive a supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the facility being a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date. The availability of supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this paragraph shall be determined by the department as follows:

(A) The adjusted projected total payment adjustment amount for each
 hospital, as determined under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (6), shall be identified.

(B) The total amount of all per diem payment adjustment amounts under this section, whether paid or payable, that are applicable to the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1996, shall be determined for each hospital, taking into account subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7). The applicability of the per diem payment adjustment amounts to this period of time shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules, including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) The amount determined under subparagraph (B) for each hospital shall be subtracted from the amount identified under subparagraph (A) for each hospital. If the remainder is a positive figure for the particular hospital, the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustment for the hospital shall be
 the positive remainder amount, which shall be payable because the facility is a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of June 30, 1996.

(D) The department shall make interim and final payments of the supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments under this paragraph on or before September 30, 1996.

(9) Except as provided in subparagraph (C), for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year each eligible hospital that remains in operation as of June 30, 1996, shall also be eligible to receive a secondary supplemental payment adjustment, which shall be payable as a result of the facility being a disproportionate share hospital in operation as of that date. The availability of secondary supplemental payment adjustments under this paragraph shall be determined by the department as follows:

(A) The maximum amount of
 secondary supplemental payment adjustments available pursuant to this paragraph shall be calculated as follows:

(i) The total amount of all per diem payment adjustment amounts, whether paid or payable, for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year, as determined under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8), shall be identified.

(ii) The total amount of all supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments, whether paid or payable, as determined under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (8), shall be identified.

(iii) The department shall estimate the total amount of payment adjustments under this section that it anticipates will be applicable to the period July 1, 1996, through September 30, 1996. The applicability of the payment adjustment amounts to this period of time shall be determined in accordance with federal medicaid rules,
 including Sections 447.297(d)(3) and 447.298 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(iv) The department shall identify the amount of the final maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California for the 1996 federal fiscal year under applicable federal rules. The amount identified shall not exceed two billion one hundred ninety-one million four hundred fifty-one thousand dollars ($2,191,451,000).

(v) The amounts identified or estimated under clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) shall be added together, and the sum of these amounts shall be subtracted from the amount identified under clause (iv). The remainder determined from this calculation, or the amount of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000), whichever is less, shall be the maximum amount available for secondary supplemental payment adjustments under this paragraph.

(B) The maximum amount available for secondary supplemental payment adjustments, as identified under clause (v) of subparagraph (A), shall be distributed to eligible hospitals as follows:

(i) The total amount of all per diem payment adjustments and supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments relating to the 1995–96 payment adjustment year, whether paid or payable, shall be identified for each eligible hospital. However, notwithstanding any other provision of law, those hospitals referred to in subparagraph (C) shall not be included in this step, and shall not receive any secondary supplemental payment adjustments, as described in subparagraph (C).

(ii) For purposes of secondary supplemental payment adjustments, the eligible hospitals shall be classified into various groups. No hospital may qualify for more than one of
 these groups. Notwithstanding subclause (II), the hospitals described in subparagraph (C) shall not be included in any of these groups. The following groups of hospitals shall be recognized:

(I) “State of California hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1995, were licensed to the State of California or to the University of California.

(II) “County hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1995, were licensed to a county or a city and county, but shall exclude those hospitals referred to in subparagraph (C).

(III) “Other public hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1995, were licensed to a local hospital district, a local health authority, a city, or any other noncounty political subdivision of the state.

(IV) “Children’s hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that, as of July 1, 1995, were included in the children’s hospital group under subdivision (h).

(V) “Other nonpublic hospitals,” which shall include all eligible hospitals that are not included in any group described in subclauses (I) through (IV).

(iii) The amount determined to be the maximum amount of secondary supplemental payment adjustments under clause (v) of subparagraph (A) shall first be allocated among the groups of hospitals referred to in clause (ii), as follows:

(I) “State of California hospitals”: 64.35 percent of the maximum amount.

(II) “County hospitals”: 18.095 percent of the maximum amount.

(III) “Other public hospitals”: 0.65 percent of the maximum amount.

(IV) “Children’s hospitals”: 6.755 percent of the maximum amount.

(V) “Other nonpublic hospitals”: 10.15 percent of the maximum amount.

(iv) (I) The amount of funds allocated pursuant to clause (iii) to each of the particular groups of hospitals referred to in clauses (ii) and (iii) shall then be distributed as secondary supplemental payment adjustments among the eligible hospitals within each particular group. The secondary supplemental distributions shall be made on a descending pro rata basis within each group. Each cycle of the descending pro rata distribution shall be considered to be a phase of the process. As described in subclauses (II) to (V), inclusive, in
 each phase of the descending pro rata distribution, the pro rata share of the distribution to each hospital that remains eligible to receive additional distributions shall be computed based on the ratio of the total payment adjustments that the particular hospital has already earned under the payment adjustment program for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year, as compared to the total payment adjustments already earned by the other hospitals in the particular group that remain eligible to receive the additional distributions.

(II) For the first phase, the total amount of payment adjustments under this section for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year, including all per diem payment adjustments and all supplemental lump-sum payment adjustments, that are determined by the department as already being paid or payable to each hospital eligible for the distribution shall be determined.

(III) The figures determined under subclause (II) for each hospital in the particular group shall be added together to determine an aggregate total.

(IV) The figures determined for each hospital under subclause (II) shall be divided by the aggregate total determined under subclause (III), yielding a percentage figure for each hospital.

(V) The percentage figure determined for each hospital under subclause (IV) shall be applied to the maximum portion of the funds allocated to the particular group under clause (iii) that can be distributed in the particular phase until a hospital in the particular group reaches the limitation set forth in clause (v).

(v) For each hospital, no secondary supplemental payment adjustment shall be paid to the extent that either of the following conditions exist:

(I) The secondary supplemental payment adjustment would cause the total of all payment adjustments to the hospital under this section relating to the 1995–96 payment adjustment year to exceed the amount that is the product of multiplying 0.95 times the particular hospital’s OBRA 1993 payment limitation for the 1995–96 payment adjustment year, as computed by the department in accordance with applicable provisions of the Medi-Cal State Plan.

(II) Without regard to any secondary supplemental payment adjustment, the hospital has already received or has earned payment adjustments relating to the 1995–96 payment adjustment year that equal or exceed the product referred to in subclause (I).

(vi) Any secondary supplemental payment adjustment amount, or portion thereof, that otherwise would have been payable to a particular